Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4146.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 18223a. (1) Until 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, except for duties performed as an employee of a governmental entity or of a nonprofit organization serving benevolent and charitable purposes, the board shall place 1 limitation on a license granted to an individual under section 18223(2). The limitation must require supervision by a psychologist who has a license other than a limited license. (2) Beginning 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, 1 limitation must be placed on a limited license granted to an individual under section 18223(2). The limitation must require supervision by a psychologist who has a license other than a limited license. The limitation described in this subsection does not apply to an individual who is granted a limited license under section 18223(2) while the individual is performing duties as an employee of a governmental entity or of a nonprofit organization serving benevolent and charitable purposes if either of the following circumstances applies: (a) The individual is not diagnosing a patient with an autism spectrum disorder. (b) If the individual is diagnosing a patient with an autism spectrum disorder, the individual has held the limited license under section 18223(2) for not less than 3 years. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00384'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H00384'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.